Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Legislative  Administration Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for payment
of the expenses of the Legislative Administration Committee, for the following purposes:
(1) General program ....................... $ 60,218,669
(2) Debt service .............................. $ 58,039,936
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,081,956 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or receive by the Legislative  Admin-
istration Committee.
SECTION 3. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by  the Legislative
Administration Committee from the Stores  Revolving Account and the Property and Supplies
Stores Account established in ORS 173.790 are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $50,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for expenses related to the Oregon Capitol History Gateway  from the
Oregon Capitol History Gateway Fund.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $1,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for expenses related to  operations for the Oregon State Capitol
Foundation from the Oregon State Capitol Foundation Operating Fund.
SECTION 6.
There is appropriated to the  Legislative Assembly, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $25,090,531 for payment of the ex-
penses of the following offices:
(1) The offices of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Repre-
sentatives;
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 1
(2) The majority and minority offices of the Senate and of the House  of Representatives;
and
(3) The offices of the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the House of Rep-
resentatives.
SECTION 7. (1) There is appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $36,066,804 for payment of the
expenses of members of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
(2) There is  appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $19,075,237 for payment of  the expenses of
members of the Eighty-fourth Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 8.
There is appropriated to the  Legislative Assembly, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,151,556 for the Legislative Equity
Office.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $157,741
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 10.
For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, expenditures by the Legislative
Assembly from the  Lounge Revolving Account established in ORS 171.117, for the costs of
food served in members’ lounges and  reimbursed through receipts on the basis of sales or
by payroll deductions from members, are not limited.
SECTION 11. There is appropriated to the Legislative Counsel Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $22,464,145.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,680,921 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Counsel
Committee.
SECTION 13. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, expenditures by the Legislative
Counsel Committee from the ORS Revolving Account established in ORS 171.305 and  from
the Legislative Publications Account established  in ORS 171.245, for services and supplies
connected with printing  and distributing legislative publications and the Oregon Revised
Statutes, are not limited.
SECTION 14. (1) There is appropriated to the Legislative Fiscal Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,418,582.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $5,783,501 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
SECTION 15. There is appropriated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $24,022,394.
SECTION 16. There is appropriated to the Legislative  Revenue Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,740,226.
SECTION 17. There is appropriated to the Commission  on Indian Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,417,653.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $7,604
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Commission on Indian
Services.
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 2
SECTION 19. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 3